test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-panj_gt-norm.yaml
     пань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [паннезланьӧттяс, паннезланьӧттис, паннесланьӧт, паннезысланьӧт]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [паннезланьӧдззаc, паннезланьӧдззиc, паннесланьӧдз, паннезысланьӧдз]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: паннесланьви
     пань+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: паннезным
     пань+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: паннезнымлӧн
     пань+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: паннезнымлісь
     пань+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: паннезнымлӧ
     пань+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: паннезнымӧс
     пань+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: паннезнаным
     пань+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: паннезнымкӧт
     пань+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [паннезнымтӧг, паннезтӧгьяным]
     пань+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: паннезнымла
     пань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: паннезнымся
     пань+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: паннезаным
     пань+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [паннезсиным, паннесиным]
     пань+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: паннезаным
     пань+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [паннезнымлань, паннезланяным]
     пань+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [паннезнымсянь, паннезсяняным]
     пань+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [паннезӧттяным, паннезӧттиным]
     пань+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [паннезӧдззаным, паннезӧдззиным]
     пань+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: паннезнымви
     пань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: паннезланяным
     пань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: паннезланьсиным
     пань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: паннезланяным
     пань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [паннезланьсяняным, паннезнымланьсянь]
     пань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [паннезланьӧттяным, паннезланьӧттиным, паннезнымланьӧт]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [паннезланьӧдззаным, паннезланьӧдззиным, паннезнымланьӧдз]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: паннезнымланьви
     пань+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: паннезныт
     пань+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: паннезнытлӧн
     пань+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: паннезнытлісь
     пань+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: паннезнытлӧ
     пань+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: паннезнытӧ
     пань+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: паннезнаныт
     пань+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: паннезныткӧт
     пань+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [паннезныттӧг, паннезтӧгьяныт]
     пань+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: паннезнытла
     пань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: паннезнытся
     пань+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: паннезаныт
     пань+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [паннезсиныт, паннесиныт]
     пань+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: паннезаныт
     пань+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [паннезнытлань, паннезланяныт]
     пань+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [паннезнытсянь, паннезсяняныт]
     пань+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [паннезӧттяныт, паннезӧттиныт]
     пань+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [паннезӧдззаныт, паннезӧдззиныт]
     пань+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: паннезнытви
     пань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: паннезланяныт
     пань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: паннезланьсиныт
     пань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: паннезланяныт
     пань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [паннезланьсяняныт, паннезнытланьсянь]
     пань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [паннезланьӧттяныт, паннезланьӧттиныт, паннезнытланьӧт]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [паннезланьӧдззаныт, паннезланьӧдззиныт, паннезнытланьӧдз]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: паннезнытланьви
     пань+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: паннезныс
     пань+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: паннезныслӧн
     пань+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: паннезныслісь
     пань+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: паннезныслӧ
     пань+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: паннезнысӧ
     пань+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: паннезнаныс
     пань+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: паннезныскӧт
     пань+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [паннезныстӧг, паннезтӧгьяныс]
     пань+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: паннезнысла
     пань+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: паннезнысся
     пань+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: паннезаныс
     пань+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [паннезсиныс, паннесиныс]
     пань+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: паннезаныс
     пань+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [паннезныслань, паннезланяныс]
     пань+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [паннезныссянь, паннезсяняныс]
     пань+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [паннезӧттяныс, паннезӧттиныс]
     пань+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [паннезӧдззаныс, паннезӧдззиныс]
     пань+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: паннезнысви
     пань+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: паннезланяныс
     пань+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: паннезланьсиныс
     пань+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: паннезланяныс
     пань+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [паннезланьсяняныс, паннезнысланьсянь]
     пань+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [паннезланьӧттяныс, паннезланьӧттиныс, паннезнысланьӧт]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [паннезланьӧдззаныс, паннезланьӧдззиныс, паннезнысланьӧдз]
     пань+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: паннезнысланьви
